Connecticut, session 2026, HB05540.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 17b-112 of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (a) The Department of Social Services shall administer a temporary
5 family assistance program under which cash assistance shall be
6 provided to eligible families in accordance with the temporary
7 assistance for needy families program, established pursuant to the
8 Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of
9 1996. The Commissioner of Social Services may operate portions of the
10 temporary family assistance program as a solely state-funded program,
11 separate from the federal temporary assistance for needy families
12 program, if the commissioner determines that doing so will enable the
13 state to avoid fiscal penalties under the temporary assistance for needy
14 families program. Families receiving assistance under the solely state-
15 funded portion of the temporary family assistance program shall be
sHB5540 / File No. 444 1

sHB5540 File No. 444
16 subject to the same conditions of eligibility as those receiving assistance
17 under the federal temporary assistance for needy families program.
18 Under the temporary family assistance program, benefits shall be
19 provided to a family for not longer than thirty-six months, except as
20 provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section. For the purpose of
21 calculating said thirty-six-month time limit, months of assistance
22 received on and after January 1, 1996, pursuant to time limits under the
23 aid to families with dependent children program, shall be included. For
24 purposes of this section, "family" means one or more individuals who
25 apply for or receive assistance together under the temporary family
26 assistance program. If the commissioner determines that federal law
27 allows individuals not otherwise in an eligible covered group for the
28 temporary family assistance program to become covered, such family
29 may also, at the discretion of the commissioner, be composed of (1) a
30 pregnant woman, or (2) a parent, both parents or other caretaker relative
31 and at least one child who is under the age of eighteen, or who is under
32 the age of nineteen and a full-time student in a secondary school or its
33 equivalent. A caretaker relative shall be related to the child or children
34 by blood, marriage or adoption or shall be the legal guardian of such a
35 child or pursuing legal proceedings necessary to achieve guardianship.
36 If the commissioner elects to allow state eligibility consistent with any
37 change in federal law, the commissioner may administratively transfer
38 any qualifying family cases under the cash assistance portion of the
39 state-administered general assistance program to the temporary family
40 assistance program without regard to usual eligibility and enrollment
41 procedures. If such families become an ineligible coverage group under
42 the federal law, the commissioner shall administratively transfer such
43 families back to the cash assistance portion of the state-administered
44 general assistance program without regard to usual eligibility and
45 enrollment procedures to the degree that such families are eligible for
46 the state program.
47 (b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall exempt a family from
48 such time-limited benefits for circumstances including, but not limited
49 to: (1) A family with a needy caretaker relative who is incapacitated or
50 of an advanced age, as defined by the commissioner, if there is no other
sHB5540 / File No. 444 2

sHB5540 File No. 444
51 nonexempt caretaker relative in the household; (2) a family with a needy
52 caretaker relative who is needed in the home because of the incapacity
53 of another member of the household, if there is no other nonexempt
54 caretaker relative in the household; (3) a family with a caretaker relative
55 who is not legally responsible for the dependent children in the
56 household if such relative's needs are not considered in calculating the
57 amount of the benefit and there is no other nonexempt caretaker relative
58 in the household; (4) a family with a caretaker relative caring for a child
59 who is under one year of age if there is no other nonexempt caretaker
60 relative in the household; (5) a family with a pregnant or postpartum
61 caretaker relative if a physician has indicated that such relative is unable
62 to work and there is no other nonexempt caretaker relative in the
63 household; (6) a family with a caretaker relative determined by the
64 commissioner to be unemployable and there is no other nonexempt
65 caretaker relative in the household; and (7) minor parents attending and
66 satisfactorily completing high school or high school equivalency
67 programs.
68 (c) A family who is subject to time-limited benefits may petition the
69 Commissioner of Social Services for six-month extensions of such
70 benefits. The commissioner shall grant not more than two extensions to
71 such family who has made a good faith effort to comply with the
72 requirements of the program and despite such effort has a total family
73 income below one hundred per cent of the federal poverty level, or has
74 encountered circumstances preventing employment including, but not
75 limited to: (1) Domestic violence or physical harm to such family's
76 children; or (2) other circumstances beyond such family's control. The
77 commissioner shall disregard ninety dollars of earned income in
78 determining applicable family income. The commissioner may grant a
79 subsequent six-month extension if each adult in the family meets one or
80 more of the following criteria: (A) The adult is precluded from engaging
81 in employment activities due to domestic violence or another reason
82 beyond the adult's control; (B) the adult has two or more substantiated
83 barriers to employment including, but not limited to, the lack of
84 available child care, substance abuse or addiction, severe mental or
85 physical health problems, one or more severe learning disabilities,
sHB5540 / File No. 444 3

sHB5540 File No. 444
86 domestic violence or a child who has a serious physical or behavioral
87 health problem; or (C) the adult is employed and works less than thirty-
88 five hours per week due to (i) a documented medical impairment that
89 limits the adult's hours of employment, provided the adult works the
90 maximum number of hours that the medical condition permits, or (ii)
91 the need to care for a disabled member of the adult's household,
92 provided the adult works the maximum number of hours the adult's
93 caregiving responsibilities permit. Families receiving temporary family
94 assistance shall be notified by the department of the right to petition for
95 such extensions. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the
96 commissioner shall not provide benefits under the state's temporary
97 family assistance program to a family that is subject to the thirty-six-
98 month benefit limit and has received benefits beginning on or after
99 October 1, 1996, if such benefits result in that family's receiving more
100 than sixty months of time-limited benefits unless that family
101 experiences domestic violence, as defined in Section 402(a)(7)(B), P.L.
102 104-193. For the purpose of calculating said sixty-month limit: (I) A
103 month shall count toward the limit if the family receives assistance for
104 any day of the month, provided any months of temporary family
105 assistance received during the public health emergency declared by
106 Governor Ned Lamont related to the COVID-19 pandemic shall not be
107 included, and (II) a month in which a family receives temporary
108 assistance for needy families benefits that are issued from a jurisdiction
109 other than Connecticut shall count toward the limit.
110 (d) (1) Under said program, no family shall be eligible that has total
111 gross earnings exceeding the federal poverty level, however, in the
112 calculation of the benefit amount for eligible families and previously
113 eligible families that become ineligible temporarily because of receipt of
114 workers' compensation benefits by a family member who subsequently
115 returns to work immediately after the period of receipt of such benefits,
116 earned income shall be disregarded up to the federal poverty level.
117 When calculating the earnings of a family with income from self-
118 employment, the commissioner shall apply a standard deduction
119 equivalent to fifty-one per cent of the total monthly income derived
120 from such self-employment, provided the family verifies at least one
sHB5540 / File No. 444 4

sHB5540 File No. 444
121 allowable expense directly related to earning such income. A family
122 may instead deduct all allowable monthly expenses directly related to
123 the self-employment earnings if such expenses are verified and, in the
124 aggregate, exceed the amount of the standard deduction. On and after
125 October 1, 2023, the commissioner shall not deny a family assistance
126 under said program on the basis of such family's assets unless such
127 assets exceed six thousand dollars. On and after July 1, 2027, the
128 commissioner shall not deny a family assistance under said program on
129 the basis of such family's assets. Except when determining eligibility for
130 a six-month extension of benefits pursuant to subsection (c) of this
131 section, the commissioner shall disregard the first fifty dollars per
132 month of income attributable to current child support that a family
133 receives in determining eligibility and benefit levels for temporary
134 family assistance. Any current child support in excess of fifty dollars per
135 month collected by the department on behalf of an eligible child shall be
136 considered in determining eligibility but shall not be considered when
137 calculating benefits and shall be taken as reimbursement for assistance
138 paid under this section, except that when the current child support
139 collected exceeds the family's monthly award of temporary family
140 assistance benefits plus fifty dollars, the current child support shall be
141 paid to the family and shall be considered when calculating benefits.
142 The commissioner shall refer any family who reports to the department
143 that such family has begun new employment or has increased
144 employment hours at a current employer to the child care subsidy
145 program established pursuant to section 17b-749.
146 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
147 subsection, [on]
148 (A) On and after January 1, 2024, in the first month in which a family's
149 total gross earnings exceed one hundred per cent of the federal poverty
150 level and for a period not to exceed six consecutive months, the
151 department shall disregard, for purposes of eligibility, a family's total
152 gross earnings in an amount not to exceed two hundred thirty per cent
153 of the federal poverty level. If a family's total gross earnings are an
154 amount between one hundred seventy-one per cent and two hundred
sHB5540 / File No. 444 5

sHB5540 File No. 444
155 thirty per cent of the federal poverty level, the department shall reduce
156 the household's benefit by twenty per cent for the months in which
157 earnings are between one hundred seventy-one per cent and two
158 hundred thirty per cent of the federal poverty level.
159 (B) On and after July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall grant a family
160 whose total gross earnings exceed one hundred per cent of the federal
161 poverty level one hundred per cent of previous benefits as a transitional
162 benefit. On and after the first six months of such transitional benefit, the
163 Commissioner of Social Services shall gradually decrease such
164 transitional benefit to zero dollars over the next six months on a
165 schedule to be determined by the commissioner. Within available
166 appropriations, the commissioner shall grant a labor force retention
167 bonus of five thousand dollars to any family that transitions out of the
168 program due to income that exceeds the eligibility standard after twelve
169 months of such transitional benefit. Any family receiving such
170 transitional benefit shall receive a referral to a Jobs First employment
171 services case manager to determine whether there are workforce
172 developmental services that may benefit any member of such family. A
173 transitional benefit received under this subdivision shall be disregarded
174 for purposes of a family's eligibility for benefits under the supplemental
175 nutrition assistance program.
176 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
177 subsection, the commissioner shall disregard any financial assistance
178 received by a family member to the extent the commissioner determines
179 that such financial assistance was provided to the family member as part
180 of such family member's participation in a pilot program that has
181 developed a plan to study and evaluate the impact and potential
182 benefits of direct cash transfers. Such disregard shall be applied for the
183 length of time the family member participates in such program, not to
184 exceed thirty-six cumulative months. Any pilot program subject to the
185 provisions of this subdivision shall have received approval from the
186 Department of Social Services to conduct such pilot program based on
187 the department's ability to receive required waivers authorizing such
188 income disregards in applicable federal and state benefits programs.
sHB5540 / File No. 444 6

sHB5540 File No. 444
189 The department shall request waivers authorizing such income
190 disregards from all federal, state and local agencies as necessary. The
191 department shall maintain a listing of approved pilot programs for use
192 by the public and department staff when determining continuing
193 eligibility of participants in existing benefits programs. The department
194 shall require an approved pilot program to (A) inform potential
195 participants, in writing in advance of participation in the pilot program,
196 of the potential impact of their participation on their current and future
197 eligibility for federal and state benefits, and (B) include contact
198 information in such written document to allow such participants to
199 obtain additional information or guidance on the impact of pilot
200 program participation on their eligibility for such benefits.
201 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
202 subsection, the commissioner shall disregard from an income eligibility
203 determination any stipend received by a family member as part of such
204 family member's participation in a job training program approved by
205 the commissioner, including, but not limited to, payments from
206 programs offered by or through the Office of Workforce Strategy
207 established pursuant to section 4-124w, the Bureau of Rehabilitation
208 Services within the Department of Aging and Disability Services or a
209 private not-for-profit organization that is exempt from taxation under
210 Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any
211 subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States,
212 as amended from time to time. Such disregard shall be applied for the
213 length of time the family member participates in such program, not to
214 exceed thirty-six cumulative months.
215 (e) A family receiving assistance under said program shall cooperate
216 with child support enforcement, under title IV-D of the Social Security
217 Act. A family shall be ineligible for benefits for failure to cooperate with
218 child support enforcement.
219 (f) A family leaving assistance at the end of (1) said thirty-six-month
220 time limit, or (2) the sixty-month limit shall have an interview for the
221 purpose of being informed of services that may continue to be available
sHB5540 / File No. 444 7

sHB5540 File No. 444
222 to such family, including employment services available through the
223 Labor Department. Such interview shall include (A) a determination of
224 benefits available to the family provided by the Department of Social
225 Services; and (B) a determination of whether such family is eligible for
226 supplemental nutrition assistance or Medicaid. Information and
227 referrals shall be made to such a family for services and benefits
228 including, but not limited to, the earned income tax credit, rental
229 subsidies, emergency housing, employment services, child care
230 subsidies pursuant to section 17b-749 and energy assistance.
231 (g) Notwithstanding section 17b-104, commencing on July 1, 2023, the
232 Commissioner of Social Services shall provide an annual cost-of-living
233 adjustment in temporary family assistance benefits equal to the most
234 recent percentage increase in the consumer price index for urban
235 consumers whenever funds appropriated for temporary family
236 assistance lapse at the close of any fiscal year and such adjustment has
237 not otherwise been included in the budget for the assistance program,
238 provided the increase would not create a budget deficiency in
239 succeeding years. The commissioner shall provide a prorated benefit
240 increase from such available lapsed funds in any fiscal year when such
241 funds are not sufficient to cover a cost-of-living adjustment in
242 accordance with this subsection.
243 (h) An applicant or recipient of temporary family assistance who is
244 adversely affected by a decision of the Commissioner of Social Services
245 may request and shall be provided a hearing in accordance with section
246 17b-60.
247 Sec. 2. Section 17b-105a of the general statutes is amended by adding
248 subsection (e) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
249 (NEW) (e) For purposes of income eligibility for the supplemental
250 nutrition assistance program, the commissioner shall disregard a
251 transitional benefit received on and after July 1, 2027, by a family under
252 the temporary family assistance program established pursuant to
253 section 17b-112, as amended by this act.
sHB5540 / File No. 444 8

sHB5540 File No. 444
254 Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1) "benefits
255 cliffs" means the loss or reduction of public assistance due to an increase
256 in employment income, and (2) "public assistance" means programs
257 including, but not limited to, temporary family assistance, supplemental
258 nutrition assistance or housing assistance. Within available
259 appropriations, the Department of Social Services and the Office of
260 Early Childhood, in consultation with the Labor Department, the
261 Department of Housing, the Office of Workforce Strategy and the two-
262 generational initiative established pursuant to section 17b-112l of the
263 general statutes, shall enter into a public-private partnership to establish
264 a two-year pilot program to mitigate benefits cliffs for two hundred
265 households receiving public assistance.
266 (b) The pilot program established pursuant to subsection (a) of this
267 section shall be designed and evaluated in accordance with the
268 recommendations of a report that was produced pursuant to special act
269 24-8. Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until the
270 pilot program concludes, the Commissioners of Social Services and
271 Early Childhood shall file a report, in accordance with the provisions of
272 section 11-4a of the general statutes, on the status of the pilot program
273 with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
274 cognizance of matters relating to education, human services, labor and
275 housing. The report shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) The
276 number of households enrolled in the pilot program, (2) transitional
277 assistance such households have received or will receive to avert
278 benefits cliffs, (3) the impact on the state economy of pilot program
279 enrollees retaining employment while in the pilot program, and (4)
280 resources needed to sustain the pilot program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-112
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 17b-105a(e)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
sHB5540 / File No. 444 9

sHB5540 File No. 444
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(d)(1), brackets around existing statutory language were
deleted and "On and after July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall not deny
a family assistance under said program on the basis of such family's
assets." was inserted, for accuracy; in Section 1(d)(2), brackets around
existing statutory language were deleted, subparagraph designators
"(A)" and "(B)" were inserted and new language was moved to new
subparagraph (B), for accuracy; and in Section 2, the effective date was
changed and "on and after July 1, 2027," was inserted, for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5540 / File No. 444 10

sHB5540 File No. 444
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost at least at least $2.6
$750,000 million
Labor Dept. GF - Cost None Significant
Social Services, Dept.; Office of GF - Cost $1.4 million $1.7 million
Early Childhood
Department of Housing GF - Cost $2.9 million $2.9 million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in increased costs to the state associated with
expanding eligibility under the Temporary Family Assistance (TFA)
program and establishing a two-year pilot program to mitigate benefits
cliffs for two hundred households receiving public assistance.
Section 1 results in a one-time cost to the Department of Social
Services (DSS) of at least $750,000 in FY 27 to support system
modifications due to changing eligibility and benefit levels under TFA.
Section 1 eliminates the TFA asset limit, effective 7/1/27. On average,
20 applications are denied each month due to exceeding the asset limit.
Assuming those denied will now be eligible under the bill’s provisions,
DSS will incur costs of at least $1.8 million in FY 28 and $2.3 in FY 29.
DSS will experience additional costs associated with newly applying
households, at an estimated average cost per household of
approximately $765 in FY 28.
sHB5540 / File No. 444 11

sHB5540 File No. 444
Section 1 also creates a transitional benefit for households with
income exceeding the federal poverty level (FPL) and requires DSS to
gradually reduce benefits over the course of six months. This is
anticipated to result in a cost of at least $850,000 in FY 28 and $1 million
in FY 29. Actual costs will depend on the reduced benefit levels
determined by DSS and eligible clients.
DSS will incur additional costs beginning in FY 29 associated with a
$5,000 labor force retention bonus provided to any family that
transitions out of the program due to income that exceeds the eligibility
standard after twelve months of such transitional benefit. Assuming the
same rate of participation as those under the transitional benefit, DSS
will incur additional costs of at least $2 million in FY 29.
Section 1 also requires that families receiving the transitional benefit
established by the bill be referred to a case manager from the Jobs First
Employment Services (JFES) program1, which is administered by the
Department of Labor (DOL). This results in a significant cost starting in
FY 28 associated with increases in workload and subsequent need for
additional staff. For reference, the cost of hiring an additional case
manager would be at least $60,0002.
Section 2 requires DSS to exclude the new transitional TFA benefit
when determining a family’s eligibility for SNAP benefits. SNAP
benefits are federally funded.
Section 3 results in a cost to DSS and the Office of Early Childhood
(OEC) related to establishing a two- year benefits cliff pilot program for
200 households receiving public assistance. The program must be
designed to align with the recommendations of the benefits cliff study
report required by Special Act 24-8.
The benefits of cliff pilot cost analysis provides a framework through
1 There are currently 42 Jobs First Employment Services case managers across the state,
averaging 53 clients each.
2 The DOL currently contracts with the five Workforce Regional Boards for the delivery
of the program.
sHB5540 / File No. 444 12

sHB5540 File No. 444
which different design parameters can be analyzed. The study presents
three pilot models to assist 200 families, resulting in costs from between
$3 million and $7 million over a three or four-year period. The study
suggests the stable benefit pilot design as the best fit to maximize family
supports. This is anticipated to result in annual costs of approximately
$1.4 million in FY 27, $1.7 million in FY 28, $1.9 million in FY 29, and
$1.7 million if continued in year four. Approximately 62% of annual
costs reflect benefit payments with the remaining funds used to support
operation costs. Actual costs depend on the final pilot design, related
federal funding and timeframe in which it is operational.
Additionally, the bill results in a cost to the Department of Housing
(DOH) of approximately $2.9 million in FY 27 and FY 28 due to
including housing assistance as part of the public assistance required
under the pilot (housing assistance was not included in the benefits cliffs
pilot cost analysis). The average rental assistance program (RAP)
certificate costs the state approximately $14,400/annually. If the
program resulted in continuing a certificate at the same level for two
years for 200 households, this would result in a cost of about $2.9 million
in each year.
DOH does not remove households from the RAP program unless the
household is no longer eligible. However, changes in eligibility and
associated changes to the average RAP certificate cost may impact how
many certificates can be issued in the future.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the structure of and benefits provided
under TFA and workload increases to the JFES program. The bill limits
the pilot program to two years.
sHB5540 / File No. 444 13

sHB5540 File No. 444
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5540
AN ACT CONCERNING THE MITIGATION OF BENEFITS CLIFFS.